Utah statutes.
39-1-17.   Adjutant general -- Custodian of military trophies.

The adjutant general shall have charge of, and shall carefully preserve, the colors, flags, guidons and military trophies of war belonging to the state, and shall not allow the same to be loaned out or removed from their proper places of deposit, and shall also be the custodian of and preserve all military documents and records of every nature, which may be placed in his charge, relating to the Indian wars within the state or wars in which the United States has participated.



No Change Since 1953

